Hawaii statutes.
§187A-4 Administrator. The board shall
appoint an administrator of aquatic resources who shall have charge, direction,
and control of all matters relating to aquatic resources management,
conservation, and development activities under this title, and such other
matters as the board may direct. The administrator shall be trained and
educated in natural resource management. [L 1985, c 94, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next